Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.756

[Art. 110] Improper hazarding of vessel.

(1) Any person subject to this code who wilfully and wrongfully hazards or suffers to be hazarded any vessel of the armed forces of the United States or of the organized militia shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

(2) Any person subject to this code who negligently hazards or suffers to be hazarded any vessel of the armed forces of the United States or of the organized militia shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

[ 1989 c 48 s 68; 1963 c 220 s 108.]